Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1003.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that, based on the office of the state auditor's 2 evaluations of the
reduced insurance premium tax rate for a company with a home office or
regional home office in Colorado, the reduced insurance premium tax rate
was designed to create an incentive to maintain a substantial workforce
presence in the state. However, even with amended criteria enacted in
House Bill 21-1312:
(a) The insurance premium tax rate tax expenditure has not met its
intended purpose since, as evidenced by the office of the state auditor's
2020 and 2025 evaluations of the tax expenditure, the hiring and investment
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

levels of the vast majority of all insurance companies claiming the tax
expenditure have not been substantially affected by the presence of the tax
expenditure; and
(b) In its 2025 evaluation of the insurance premium tax rate tax
expenditure, the office of the state auditor found that, from 2022 through
2024, 15 of the 18 insurers that claimed the tax expenditure actually
reduced their Colorado workforces by about 4,300 employees, while the tax
benefit that those insurers received from the tax expenditure increased by
approximately $17,500,000. Moreover, the reduction in the Colorado
workforce of those Colorado insurers that claimed the tax expenditure
occurred during a period when the number of insurance jobs increased
nationally.
(2) The general assembly further finds that:
(a) The primary purposes of repealing the reduced insurance
premium tax rate for a company with a home office or regional home office
in Colorado are to better align the state's insurance premium tax code with
the tax codes of other states, so that Colorado is less of an outlier regarding
how insurance taxpayers compute their taxes owed, and to streamline
insurance premium tax statutes by eliminating a tax expenditure that is not
meeting its intended purpose; and
(b) Any revenue gain that results from the improved alignment of
the state's insurance premium tax code with the tax codes of other states and
the streamlining of the insurance premium tax statutes is:
(I) Incidental to the primary purpose of better aligning the state's
insurance premium tax code with the tax codes of other states; and
(II) De minimis.
(3) Therefore, the general assembly declares, consistent with the
Colorado supreme court's holding in TABOR Found. v. Reg'l Transp. Dist.,
2018 CO 29, that legislation causing only an incidental and de minimis tax
revenue increase does not amount to a new tax or a tax policy change that
requires advance voter approval under section 20 of article X of the
Colorado constitution, the removal of the reduced insurance premium tax
rate for a company with a home office or regional home office in Colorado
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 25B-1003

is neither a new tax nor a tax policy change that requires voter approval.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-3-209, amend
(1)(b)(I) introductory portion and (1)(b)(I)(B); and add (1)(b)(IV) as
follows:
10-3-209. Tax on premiums collected - exemptions - penalties -
filing system - division to contract with third parties - rules - repeal.
(1) (b) (I) The rate of tax shall be IS as follows:
(B) For DIRECT WRITTEN PREMIUMS IN 2025, FOR companies
maintaining a home office or a regional home office in this state, the rate of
tax on the gross amount shall be IS one percent. ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1,
2026, THE TAX RATE IS TWO PERCENT.
(IV) SUBSECTIONS (1)(b)(I)(B), (1)(b)(II), (1)(b)(II.5), (1)(b)(II.7),
AND (1)(b)(III) OF THIS SECTION AND THIS SUBSECTION (1)(b)(IV) ARE
REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 25B-1003

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Connor Randall Esther van Mourik
ACTING CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 25B-1003